Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5934.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11c. For an application for a building permit or an additional permit that an applicant submits to the department, if the department fails to grant, in whole or in part, or deny the application within the time periods described in section 11(1), the department shall reimburse to the applicant the fee that the applicant paid to the department under section 10. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5932. (b) House Bill No. 5933. (c) House Bill No. 5935.